Mississippi, session 2026, SB2658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 51-15-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-15-123.  (1)  The Pat Harrison Waterway District is authorized to establish or otherwise provide for public parks and recreation facilities and for the preservation of fish and wildlife, and to acquire land otherwise than by condemnation except as provided in subsection (e) of Section 51-15-119 for such purposes, within the project area. (2)  In addition to any other powers granted by law, the district is authorized to establish and implement discount programs for active-duty, reserve, National Guard, as well as veteran members of the United States Armed Forces for access to and use of district parks, campgrounds, facilities and other recreational areas. (3)  The district's board of directors shall have the discretion to determine the eligibility requirements, discount rates, and terms and conditions applicable to such military discount programs.  Such discounts may include, but are not limited to, reduced entrance fees, camping fees, facility rentals or other user charges. (4)  The district's board of directors may adopt policies, procedures and documentation requirements as necessary to verify eligibility and administer the discounts authorized by this section. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the district's authority to offer other promotional or public benefit programs consistent with its statutory purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.